Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska81-659
Brain injury registry; certain data; confidential; access; when.

No patient-identifying data as defined in section 81-664 shall be disclosed, made public, or released by the department to any public or private person or entity. All other data obtained from medical records of persons sustaining brain or head injury is for the confidential use as Class I, Class II, or Class IV data of the department and the private or public persons or entities that the department determines may view such records as provided in sections 81-663 to 81-675.

Laws 1992, LB 308, § 7;

Laws 1993, LB 536, § 122;

Laws 2008, LB928, § 38.